Utah statutes.
58-40-501.   Unlawful conduct.

"Unlawful conduct" includes:

(1)  providing, leading, facilitating, teaching, or offering to provide or teach recreational therapy services unless licensed under this chapter or exempted from licensure under Section 58-1-307 or 58-40-305;

(2)  using the initials MTRS, TRS, or TRT, or other abbreviation, term, title, or sign relating to the practice of recreational therapy services unless licensed under this chapter; and

(3)  employing or aiding and abetting the employment of an unqualified or unlicensed person to:

(a)  practice as a recreational therapist; or

(b)  provide recreational therapy services.

